Utah statutes.
62A-7-107.5.   Contracts with private providers.

(1)  This chapter does not prohibit the division from contracting with private providers or other agencies for the construction, operation, and maintenance of juvenile facilities or the provision of care, treatment, and supervision of youth offenders who have been committed to the care of the division.

(2)  All programs for the care, treatment, and supervision of youth offenders committed to the division shall be licensed in compliance with division standards within six months after commencing operation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 13, 2005 General Session

